Hawaii statutes.
[§672B-15] Statute of limitations tolled.
The filing of the claim with the design claim conciliation panel or with an approved
alternative dispute resolution provider shall toll any applicable statute of limitations,
and any such statute of limitations shall remain tolled until sixty days after
the date of the decision of the panel or the notification of completion from
the approved alternative dispute resolution provider is mailed or delivered to
the parties. If a decision by the design claim conciliation panel is not reached
within twelve months, or the alternative dispute resolution process is not
completed within twelve months, the statute of limitations shall resume running
and the party filing the claim may commence a suit based on the claim in any
appropriate court of this State. The panel or the approved alternative dispute
resolution provider shall notify all parties in writing of this provision. [L
2007, c 207, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next